Hawaii statutes.
§183D-24 Duplicate licenses. Duplicate
licenses may be issued upon application stating under oath that the original
license has been lost or destroyed and upon payment of a fee of fifty per cent
of the current cost of a resident license as provided in section 183D-22(b)(1).
[L 1985, c 174, pt of §4; am L 1998, c 288, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next